Utah statutes.
13-14a-5.   Notice or consent required before changing terms of retailing
agreement -- Limitations on pledge of personal assets -- Cancellation of
retailing agreement.
(1)  Each manufacturer, wholesaler, financing subsidiary or division of the
manufacturer, or any independent lender shall give the dealer prior written
notice and obtain the dealer's consent before:
(a)  changing either the time or manner of payment;
(b)  making any changes in notes or security;
(c)  adding or releasing guarantors; or
(d)  granting extensions or renewals in payment schedules on any contract that
is executed by the dealer in behalf of and in the name of any third purchaser
of goods or services in which the dealer is obligated to assume contingent
liability for the repurchase of that contract upon default by that third
party.
(2)  A person who signs a security agreement or guarantee agreement with a
manufacturer or wholesaler may not be required to pledge or encumber his
personal assets in a value in excess of the amount of the indebtedness
secured.
(3)  If any manufacturer or wholesaler fails to give notice or obtain consent
under Subsection (1), or fails to comply with Subsection (2), the guarantee or
security agreement affected is considered cancelled and terminated.
